North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-21.2 Trees for North Dakota Program [Repealed]

4-21.2-01.
Trees for North Dakota program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 573, § 1; 1995, ch. 503, § 1; 2001, ch. 68, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.2-02.
Trees for North Dakota program trust fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 573, § 1; 1995, ch. 503, § 1; 2001, ch. 68, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-21.2-03.
Authority for local governments to participate. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 573, § 1; 1995, ch. 503, § 1; 2001, ch. 68, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.